Utah statutes.
58-9-504.   Authority to promulgate rules.

In addition to the authority granted under Section 58-1-106, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division in collaboration with the board shall establish by rule:

(1)  the minimum requirements for a licensed funeral establishment for the following:

(a)  physical facilities;

(b)  equipment;

(c)  instruments; and

(d)  supplies;

(2)  license cycles under Section 58-9-303;

(3)  standards to protect the interests of buyers and potential buyers of preneed funeral arrangements under Section 58-9-701; and

(4)  standards for preneed funeral arrangement trusts.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

